Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3229
Districts; purposes.

The purposes of natural resources districts shall be to develop and execute, through the exercise of powers and authorities granted by law, plans, facilities, works, and programs relating to (1) erosion prevention and control, (2) prevention of damages from flood water and sediment, (3) flood prevention and control, (4) soil conservation, (5) water supply for any beneficial uses, (6) development, management, utilization, and conservation of ground water and surface water, (7) pollution control, (8) solid waste disposal and sanitary drainage, (9) drainage improvement and channel rectification, (10) development and management of fish and wildlife habitat, (11) development and management of recreational and park facilities, and (12) forestry and range management.

As to development and management of fish and wildlife habitat and development and management of recreational and park facilities, such plans, facilities, works, and programs shall be in conformance with any outdoor recreation plan for Nebraska and any fish and wildlife plan for Nebraska as developed by the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 29, p. 118;

Laws 1972, LB 543, § 11;

Laws 1981, LB 326, § 9;

Laws 1982, LB 565, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 573, § 8.

Standing is not implied in, incident to, or indispensably essential to any express powers or declared objects and purposes of a natural resources district. Metropolitan Utilities Dist. v. Twin Platte NRD, 250 Neb. 442, 550 N.W.2d 907 (1996).